Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WILDERNESS INQUIRY PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $675,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $729,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Wilderness Inquiry for the Canoemobile program and Pyramid of Outdoor Engagement to provide a progression of outdoor educational and recreational experiences that occur statewide, align with Minnesota graduation standards, and tie to Minnesota's rich cultural heritage by connecting youth and families to our state's natural resources, outdoor traditions, and public lands and waterways. new text end